Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1094.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 12, chapter 6, article 12, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 12-723, to read: START_STATUTE12-723. Irreversible gender reassignment surgery; civil liability; statute of limitations; definitions A. A physician who provides irreversible gender reassignment surgery to a minor in violation of section 32-3230 is liable in a civil action to the minor for damages that result from the surgery, including any damages that would not have otherwise occurred but for the surgery. B. It is not a defense to liability under this section that the minor's parents consented to the irreversible gender reassignment surgery. C. A person who prevails under this section shall be awarded actual damages, including damages for mental anguish even if an injury other than mental anguish is not shown, exemplary damages, court costs and reasonable attorney fees. D. Notwithstanding any other law, an action for the recovery of damages under this section shall be commenced not later than twenty-five years after the minor turns eighteen years of age or four years after the minor who had the irreversible gender reassignment surgery undergoes detransition treatment, whichever is later. E. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Irreversible gender reassignment surgery" has the same meaning prescribed in section 32-3230. 2. "Physician" has the same meaning prescribed in section 32-3230. END_STATUTE